Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.735

Unlawful practice—Hygienists—Penalty.

Any licensed dentist who shall permit any dental hygienist operating under his or her supervision to perform any operation required to be performed by a dentist under the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 478; 1935 c 112 s 28; RRS s 10031-28. Formerly RCW 18.32.340.]